Illinois, session 104th, HB5483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 50-41 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/50-41 new)7    Sec. 50-41. Firearms; ammunition, accessories, and parts.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Ammunition" means firearm ammunition as defined in 10Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 11    "Firearm" has the meaning given to that term in Section 121.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 13    "Firearm accessory" means a supplementary item designed to 14enhance a firearm's functionality, performance, or user 15experience or to modify a firearm or external gear used in 16conjunction with a firearm, including, but not limited to, the 17following: sights and optics; holsters; magazines; grips; 18slings; muzzle devices, suppressors, compensators, and flash 19hiders; bipods; trigger upgrades and conversion devices; 20cleaning kits; and ammunition carriers. 21    "Firearm precursor part" means any forging, casting, 22printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar object that has 23reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be   HB5483- 2 -LRB104 15973 HLH 29216 b1completed, assembled, or converted for use as a firearm frame 2or receiver or that is marketed or sold to the public to become 3or to be used as a firearm frame or receiver once completed, 4assembled, or converted. 5    (b) Each bidder who submits a bid to a State agency for a 6contract to supply the State agency with firearms, ammunition, 7or firearm accessories must certify to the State agency as 8part of the bid, under penalty of perjury, that the bidder does 9not sell unserialized gun build kits or firearm precursor 10parts, including, but not limited to, unserialized firearms, 11unserialized unfinished frames, and unserialized unfinished 12receivers. 13    (c) Each bidder who submits a bid to a State agency for a 14contract to supply the State agency with firearms, ammunition, 15or firearm accessories and each contractor who is awarded such 16a contract shall, during the public procurement process, on an 17annual basis, and upon request of the State agency provide to 18the State agency: 19        (1) a copy of all licenses, permits, or certificates 20    required for the sale of firearms, ammunition, or firearm 21    accessories, as applicable; 22        (2) materials documenting (i) the number of trace 23    requests the bidder or contractor received from the 24    federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and 25    Explosives during the 5 calendar years immediately 26    preceding the date on which the material is provided to   HB5483- 3 -LRB104 15973 HLH 29216 b1    the State agency and (ii) the amount of time that elapsed 2    between the sale of the subject firearm and the receipt of 3    that trace request; 4        (3) materials documenting any theft or losses of 5    firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories from the 6    bidder's or contractor's premises during the 5 calendar 7    years immediately preceding the date on which the material 8    is provided to the State agency; and 9        (4) copies of the 2 most recent inspection reports of 10    any inspection conducted by a federal, State, or local 11    agency focused on compliance with firearm or ammunition 12    laws, including, but not limited to, any follow-up 13    materials documenting administrative actions taken by the 14    agency. 15    If a bidder for or party to a contract with a State agency 16for the procurement of firearms, ammunition, or firearm 17accessories is unable to provide sufficient materials required 18under items (1) through (4), then the bidder must submit to the 19State agency a declaration explaining why the bidder is unable 20to do so and the steps the bider is taking to be able to do so 21within a year. 22    Each bidder described in this subsection (c) must affirm 23to the State agency that the bidder complies with all 24applicable local, State, and federal laws related to the sale 25or transfer of firearms, ammunition and firearms accessories. 26    (d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (b) and   HB5483- 4 -LRB104 15973 HLH 29216 b1(c), each bidder who submits a bid to a State agency for a 2contract to supply the State agency with firearms, ammunition, 3or firearm accessories and each contractor who is awarded such 4a contract shall, during the public procurement process, on an 5annual basis, and upon request of the State agency, provide to 6the State agency in writing any practices or policies, 7including, but not limited to, any amendments to those 8practices or policies made during the public procurement 9process, that are in effect or adopted by the bidder or 10contractor or required by the terms of any contract to which 11the bidder or contractor is a party and that: 12        (1) prevent, detect, and screen for the transfer of 13    firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories to straw 14    purchasers or firearm traffickers; 15        (2) prevent, detect, and screen against the sale of 16    firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories to an 17    individual prohibited from possessing a firearm by 18    federal, State, or local law, or court order; 19        (3) prevent, detect, and document the theft or loss of 20    firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories; 21        (4) pertain to the training of employees to ensure 22    compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local 23    firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories laws and 24    regulations; 25        (5) assist law enforcement agencies in the 26    investigation or prevention of criminal access to   HB5483- 5 -LRB104 15973 HLH 29216 b1    firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories; and 2        (6) pertain to the operation of a digital video 3    surveillance system as required under the Firearm Dealer 4    License Certification Act. 5    (e) A State agency shall reject a bid for any contract to 6supply the State agency with firearms, ammunition, or firearm 7accessories if the bidder or contractor has not complied with 8the provisions of this Section. 9    (f) A State agency shall not waive any of the requirements 10of this Section or make exigent or emergency purchases of 11firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories. 12    (g) The Office of the Attorney General shall adopt rules 13to implement the provisions of this Section. Those rules shall 14include, but shall not be limited to:15        (1) a process to administer and assess a bidder's or 16    contractor's compliance with the requirements of this 17    Section as part of contract awards and renewals; and 18        (2) a prequalification process to preapprove potential 19    bidders. 20    (h) This Section applies to any contract for the 21procurement of firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories 22that a State agency solicits, enters into, awards, amends, 23renews, or extends on or after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.